District of Columbia statutes.
34-710

Fines, penalties and forfeitures to be paid into Treasury.

All moneys received from fines, forfeitures, and penalties shall be paid into the Treasury of the United States to the credit of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 996, ch. 150, § 8, par. 98
Feb. 22, 1921, 41 Stat. 1144, ch. 70, § 7
June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 18

History

1981 Ed., § 43-312.
1973 Ed., § 43-912.

Prior Codifications